Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-906
Passive solar energy system, defined.

Passive solar energy system shall mean any space or structural components that are specifically designed to retain heat derived from solar energy, including ponds for evaporative cooling, and any moving parts that increase heat retention by the system.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 6.